apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.mk.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>
<dictionary>
 <alphabet>АБВГДЃЕЖЗЅИЈКЛЉМНЊОПРСТЌУФХЦЧЏШабвгдѓежзѕијклљмнњопрстќуфхцчџш</alphabet>

 <xi:include xmlns:xi="http://www.w3.org/2001/XInclude" href="apertium-sh-mk.symbols.xml"/>

 <pardefs>
  <!-- punctuation -->
    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>'</l>
         <r>'<s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <!-- Definite articles -->

    <pardef n="и">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r><j/><a/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="S__m_sg_def">
     <e>
       <par n="и"/>
       <p>
         <l>от</l>
         <r>art<s n="det"/><s n="def"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ов</l>
         <r><j/>art<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="prx"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>он</l>
         <r><j/>art<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="dst"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r/>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="S__f_sg_def">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>та</l>
         <r><j/>art<s n="det"/><s n="def"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ва</l>
         <r><j/>art<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="prx"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>на</l>
         <r><j/>art<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="dst"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r/>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="S__nt_sg_def">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>то</l>
         <r><j/>art<s n="det"/><s n="def"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>во</l>
         <r><j/>art<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="prx"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>но</l>
         <r><j/>art<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="dst"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r/>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="S__mf_pl_def">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>те</l>
         <r><j/>art<s n="det"/><s n="def"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ве</l>
         <r><j/>art<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="prx"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>не</l>
         <r><j/>art<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="dst"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r/>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="S__nt_pl_def">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>та</l>
         <r><j/>art<s n="det"/><s n="def"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>вa</l>
         <r><j/>art<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="prx"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>нa</l>
         <r><j/>art<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="dst"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r/>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>



   <pardef n="да__ij">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="ij"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="personal_pronouns__prn">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>јас</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ти</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>тој</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>таа</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>тоа</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ние</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>виe</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>тиe</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>мене</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>тебе</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>него</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>неа</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>него</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>нас</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>вас</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>нив</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>мене</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>тебе</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>нему</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>нејзе</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>нему</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>нам</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>вам</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ним</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <e lm="personal pronouns"><i/><par n="personal_pronouns__prn"/></e>
   <e lm="да"><i>да</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
   <e>
      <par n="separa"/>
   </e>
   <e>
      <par n="numeros"/>
   </e>
   <e>
      <par n="coma"/>
   </e>
   <e>
      <par n="cometa"/>
   </e>
   <e>
      <par n="paresq"/>
   </e>
   <e>
      <par n="pardret"/>
   </e>
   <e>
      <par n="guionet"/>
   </e>
